California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) Aids or abets a person in the violation of this article.

(e) Fails in any material respect to comply with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 46.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

778.5.

The board shall develop criteria to determine whether a felony is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a registered professional forester in order to aid it when considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 382, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

779.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

780.

The fees received pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Professional Forester Registration Fund in the State Treasury, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

781.

All fees received pursuant to this article shall be available, when appropriated by the Legislature, for the administration of this article; provided, that in the event that moneys need to be expended from the Professional Forester Registration Fund for emergencies for which no appropriation, or an insufficient appropriation, has been made by law, and which in the judgment of the Director of Finance constitutes a case of actual necessity, but limited to purposes of administration of this article that have been specifically approved by the Legislature in budget acts or other legislation, the Director of Finance may authorize an emergency expenditure in an amount determined by the Director of Finance from the fund; provided,
 further, that the Director of Finance shall file with the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days after approval of the emergency expenditure, copies of all executive orders, expenditure authorizations, and allotments made pursuant to this section, and stating the reasons for, and the amount of, those expenditures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 47.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

782.

The board shall establish by regulation the amount of fees within the following ranges, and based on a determination by the board of the amount of revenues reasonably necessary to carry out this article:

(a) The application fee for registration or for each certificate of specialization shall be not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than six hundred dollars ($600).

(b) The registration fee and certificate of specialization fees and renewal fees shall be not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) and
 not more than
 seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per year. Every licensed person shall, on or before July 1 of the year of expiration, pay the renewal fee.

(c) The fee for the issuance of a duplicate display registration document or certificate of specialization shall be not less than five dollars ($5) and not more than
 seventy-five dollars ($75).

(d) The penalty fee for failure to apply for a renewal shall be not less than ten dollars ($10) and not more than
 seventy-five dollars ($75) for each month of delinquency. In return for the payment of the renewal fee and any applicable late fees, a renewal registration card shall be issued.

(e) A registrant or certificant may, upon written notice to the board, be granted a withdrawal period without penalty not to exceed five years. A reinstatement application shall be accompanied with a fee of not less than fifteen dollars ($15) and not more than
 one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for registration or each certificate of specialization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 14, Sec. 6.   (SB 124)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

783.

In case a person defaults in payment of the renewal fee, the person’s registration may be revoked by the board on 60 days’ notice in writing from the board, unless within this time the fee is paid, together with penalty, not exceeding the amount fixed by this article. Upon payment of the fee and penalty within one year, the board shall reinstate the person’s registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 48.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powerplant Siting [800. - 801.]

800.

It is the policy of the State of California that the location and operation of thermal electric powerplants shall enhance public benefits and protect against or minimize adverse effects on the public, the ecology of the land and its wildlife, and the ecology of state waters and their aquatic life, and that the public’s opportunity to enjoy the material, physical and aesthetic benefits of its resources shall be preserved to the greatest extent feasible.

The Legislature declares that it is also the policy of the state to encourage the use of nuclear energy, geothermal resources, and such other energy sources as are currently under development, wherever feasible, recognizing that such use has the potential of providing direct economic benefit to the public, while helping to conserve limited fossil fuel resources and promoting air cleanliness.

The Legislature further declares that it is the policy of the state to encourage planning by the state’s electric utilities toward the above-stated objectives and to assist the utilities in their evaluations of the effects on the environment of proposed thermal powerplant sites and to that end a State Powerplant Siting Committee has been established to effect such coordination with the utilities and to carry out specific responsibilities as may be defined in the Public Utilities Code and the Public Resources Code.

The Legislature finds that the state should conduct research relating to the conservation, enhancement and prudent use of its resources, including those associated with the siting of thermal powerplants.

The Legislature finds that the state should also stimulate, sponsor and conduct appropriate research and study on new methods of powerplant siting which offer potential for enhanced public benefits in location, operation, and protection of the environment with such investigations including underground and underocean sites, manmade islands, powerplant parks, the desirability of locations on or near tidal lagoons, and other concepts which may appear attractive in minimizing the impact on the environment of the large projected increase in California electric generating capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1299.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

In accordance with state policy, it shall be the responsibility of the Resources Agency to establish a program of research on improved methods of powerplant siting. Recognizing the very considerable experience, knowledge and effort of the state’s electric utilities in this field, the Resources Agency shall coordinate its research programs with the electric utilities to insure minimum duplication and maximum interchange of information with the results of the state’s research program being published and made available as public information.

In accord with recommendation No. 3 made in the Resources Agency’s report to the Legislature on Siting Thermal Powerplants in California, dated February 15, 1970, and concurred in by the Utilities Ad Hoc Committee, the Resources Agency is specifically authorized to undertake a study of the siting of underground powerplants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Aquaculture Development [825. - 830.]

825.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Aquaculture Development Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people of the state that the practice of aquaculture be encouraged in order to augment food supplies, expand employment, promote economic activity, increase native fish stocks, enhance commercial and recreational fishing, and protect and better use the land and water resources of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a policy and program toward improving the science and practice of aquaculture as a means of expanding aquaculture industry and related economic activity in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

As used in this chapter, “aquaculture” means the culture and husbandry of aquatic organisms, including, but not limited to, fish, shellfish, mollusks, crustaceans, kelp, and algae. Aquaculture shall not mean the culture and husbandry of commercially utilized inland crops, including, but not limited to, rice, watercress, and bean sprouts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

As used in this chapter, “director” means the Director of the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

830.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of Fish and Game.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.5. EQUITABLE OUTDOOR ACCESS ACT [1000. - 1003.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1000. - 1000.]

1000.

(a) This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Equitable Outdoor Access Act.

(b) This division sets forth the state’s commitment to ensuring all Californians can benefit from, and have meaningful and sustainable access to, the state’s rich cultural and natural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Policy [1001. - 1003.]

1001.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The biodiversity of California is comprised of the plants, animals, including humans, and fungi that reside within the state, as well as its rivers, lakes, beaches, deserts, forests, mountain ranges, and other natural landscapes.

(b) The state’s cultural and natural resources are a shared heritage that no single individual or entity is more entitled to access to, or benefit from, than another and must be stewarded for future generations.

(c) Countless Californians still face barriers to visiting and enjoying
 the state’s natural resources and outdoor spaces, including local, regional, state, and federal parks and beaches, and other public lands and outdoor spaces. These barriers include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Lack of safe, reliable, and affordable routes to outdoor spaces, including transportation and pathways accessible for people with disabilities.

(2) Cost of admission, parking, and overnight accommodations at or near these spaces.

(3) Lack of accessible public information and exposure to the outdoors necessary to ensure familiarity and comfort with being in these spaces.

(4) Lack of culturally relevant and multilingual programming.

(5) Lack of local, quality outdoor spaces and amenities, including parks, pedestrian tree canopies, green streets, greenways, trails, community gardens, and other greenspaces.

(6) Lack of outdoor programming opportunities, including, but not limited to, recreational, cultural, and educational activities, in many communities.

(7) Local hostility towards visitors of these spaces and intentional efforts to restrict access.

(d) The state faces a biodiversity and nature crisis that scientists say we must address with urgency.

(e) Nature, like the climate, is nearing a tipping point where the continued
 loss and degradation of the natural environment will push many ecosystems and wildlife species past the point of no return, threaten the health and economic prosperity of California and the United States, and increase the costs of natural disasters.

(f) Before European contact with the American continents, tribal nations, Native American tribes, and tribal entities managed and stewarded the state’s terrestrial and marine resources using traditional ecological knowledge and a wide array of traditional practices and techniques to maintain an environment capable of supporting large, thriving human, plant, and animal populations. Today, tribes continue to use these practices, which vary from tribe to tribe, but are generally focused on ecosystem interconnectivity, respecting the carrying capacity of the land, and viewing humans as an
 integral part of the environment. Tribal methods of protecting and managing the land are an essential and fundamental part of a concerted effort to successfully rebalance the climate and restore biodiversity.

(g) Access to, and the benefits of, nature are essential to the health, well-being, identity, culture, and economic prosperity of the state.

(h) Accessing and connecting with the state’s prized cultural and natural resources and experiencing the public and mental health, cultural, economic, and other benefits outdoor recreation can provide is essential to cultivating an appreciation and respect for nature that motivates conservation, biodiversity protection, and other actions to protect our climate and planet.

(i) The loss of nature and lack of access to nature negatively affects people of color disproportionately, especially people of color living in disadvantaged communities. Research shows that communities of color are three times more likely than White communities to live in nature-deprived areas and that 70 percent of low-income communities live in nature-deprived areas.

(j) The loss of habitat for fish and wildlife, inadequate water supplies, pollution in the air and water, the loss of pollinators, uncontrollable wildfires, and climate change are of increasing concern to many communities across California but especially to communities of color and disadvantaged communities.

(k) The state has a responsibility to conserve land, air, water, ocean, and wildlife resources in the
 state as necessary to prevent the further decline of nature and to address barriers to access, especially for low-income and disadvantaged communities disproportionately affected by them, to ensure that all Californians have access to nature and a healthy environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state to:

(1) Ensure that all Californians have equitable opportunities to safe and affordable access to nature and access to the benefits of nature.

(2) Maximize public access to public lands, including the state’s cultural and natural resources, in a sustainable manner, where appropriate, with a special emphasis on creating and promoting opportunities for people and communities that face disproportionate barriers to access, including, but not limited to, communities of color, indigenous communities, and economically disadvantaged
 communities.

(3) Prevent and minimize the intentional and unwarranted limitation of sustainable public access to public lands, where appropriate, including, but not limited to, local, regional, state, and federal parks, rivers, lakes, beaches, forests, mountain ranges, deserts, and other natural landscapes.

(b) All relevant state agencies, including the Natural Resources Agency, and each department, board, office, conservancy, and commission within the agency, and state departments, including the Department of Transportation, shall consider and incorporate, as appropriate, this state policy when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, or grant criteria, or making expenditures, to the extent the policies, regulations, grant criteria, or expenditures are not in
 conflict with an appropriation.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state, in implementing this division, provide for the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of people of all races, cultures, incomes, and national origins, and solicit, account for, and respond to the voices, needs, and priorities of communities of color, indigenous communities, and economically disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, all state agencies implementing this state policy shall do so in a manner consistent with the mission of their agency that protects the health and safety of the public and that conserves natural and cultural resources. This section shall not prohibit an affected state agency, department, board, office, conservancy, or commission from enacting any policy, standard, or condition that is intended to preserve the public health and safety.

(b) The state shall encourage the types of access that promote, and are consistent with, the conservation goals described in subdivision (a).

(c) On or before January 1, 2024, the Natural Resources Agency shall prepare a report and submit it to the Legislature containing information related to the implementation of this division.

(d) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision
 (c) is inoperative on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   (AB 30)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. GEOLOGY, MINES AND MINING [2001. - 2815.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [2001. - 2009.]

2001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of Division II of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

“Department,” in reference to the government of this state, means the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.5.

“Director” means the Director of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1019, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2003.

“Survey,” in reference to the government of this state, means the California Geological Survey in the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 12.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2004.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, association, corporation, organization, limited liability company, or partnership, or any city, county, district, or the state or any department or agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2005.

“Minerals” means any naturally occurring chemical element or compound, or groups of elements and compounds, formed from inorganic processes and organic substances, including, but not limited to, coal, peat, and bituminous rock, but excluding geothermal resources, natural gas, and petroleum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.

“State Geologist” means the individual holding the office created by Section 677.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.5.

“Supervisor of Mine Reclamation” or “supervisor” means the individual directing the Division of Mine Reclamation established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 607.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 13.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2007.

“Exploration” or “prospecting” means the search for minerals by geological, geophysical, geochemical or other techniques, including, but not limited to, sampling, assaying, drilling, or any surface or underground works needed to determine the type, extent, or quantity of minerals present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2008.

“Board” means the State Mining and Geology Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2009.

“Geologic hazard” means a geologic condition that is a potential danger to life and property. Geologic hazards include, but are not limited to, earthquake, landslide, mineral hazards, postfire debris flow, subsidence, coastal and inland erosion, expansive soil, fault displacement, and volcanic eruption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 2.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The California Geological Survey [2200. - 2213.]

2200.

For the purposes of this chapter, “mine” includes all mineral bearing properties of whatever kind or character, whether underground, or in a quarry or pit, or any other source from which any mineral substance is or may be obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2200.5.

For the purposes of this chapter, “lead agency” means the city, county, San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, or the board that has the principal responsibility for approving a surface mining operation or reclamation plan pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 4.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

The department is the primary state agency responsible for review and investigation of geologic hazards, as defined in Section 2009, including, but not limited to, the strong motion aspects of earthquake and any geologic hazards that may occur in relation to natural disasters and climate change. In this capacity, the survey shall carry out activities and programs to reduce the loss of life and property and protect the environment by mitigating geologic hazards. Specific activities to be carried out by the survey include, but are not limited to, all of the
 following:

(a) Hazard assessment, including identification and mapping of geologic hazards and estimates of their potential consequences to life, property, and the environment, and the likelihood of occurrence.

(b) Information and advisory services, including the maintenance of a geologic library, a public education program, maintenance of a statewide surface and subsurface geologic database, review functions, and expert
 consulting.

(c) Emergency response to geologic hazards, including, but not limited to, those related to natural disasters, including the monitoring and assessment of anomalous geologic activity, and the operation of a clearinghouse for postevent earth science investigations.

(d) Development and application of mitigation methods, including identifying state research needs, facilitating needed research, and expediting the application of new research results to public policy and all survey activities related to geologic hazards and the effects of climate change on geologic hazards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

The director may do any of the following:

(a) (1) Make a collection of typical geological and mineralogical specimens, especially those of economic and commercial importance, and of models, drawings, and descriptions of the mechanical appliances used in mining and metallurgical processes and geology, with that collection constituting the museum of the survey, which shall be known as the California State Mining and Mineral Museum.

(2) For the purposes of ensuring financial support and oversight of the museum, the department, museum staff, and the California State Mining and Mineral
 Museum Association may take all appropriate measures to encourage donations for the support of the museum by individuals, companies, and organizations. These donations shall be collected by the department and deposited in the California State Mining and Mineral Museum Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure for the following activities, in the following order of priority:

(A) Payment of curation, interpretation services, and administrative costs.

(B) Payment of management and visitation enhancement services.

(C) Operational costs of the museum.

(b) Provide a library of books, reports, and drawings bearing upon the mineral industries, the sciences of mineralogy and geology, and the arts of mining and metallurgy.

(c) Preserve and maintain that collection and library as to make them available for reference and examination, and open to public inspection at reasonable hours.

(d) Maintain a bureau of information concerning the mineral industries of this state, which is to consist of that collection and library, and arrange, classify, catalog, and index that data in a manner that makes the information available to those desiring it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 17.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

The State Geologist shall provide all requested and recommended information to the director who shall prepare a report for transmission to the Governor on or before the 15th day of September of each year. The report shall include a section reviewing the status of measures taken in the state to counter geologic hazards and a section reviewing the economic utilization and conservation of the state’s mineral resources and problems related thereto pursuant to Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 2650).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

The director may receive on behalf of this state, for the use and benefit of the survey, gifts, bequests, devises, and legacies of real or other property and may use the same in accordance with the wishes of the donors. If no instructions are given by the donors, the director shall manage, use, and dispose of the gifts, bequests, and legacies for the best interests of the survey and in such manner as the director may determine to be proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 18.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

The State Geologist may do all of the following:

(a) Make, facilitate, and encourage special studies of the mineral resources, mineral industries,
 geology, and geologic hazards in the state.

(b) Collect statistics concerning the occurrence and production of the economically important minerals and the methods pursued in making their valuable constituents available for commercial use.

(c) Conduct and provide technical assistance to public and private entities, including for geological investigations, studies, and other activities for purposes that include, but are not limited to, the timely identification, delineation, and assessment of geologic hazards and their potential consequences.

(d) Identify and delineate deposits of mineral raw materials in order to prevent their loss to urban encroachment and to assist in
 their ultimate utilization; and enter into, as the need arises, cooperative agreements, for geological or mineral industry investigations, with public and private entities that may provide for cost sharing or cooperative funding.

(e) Maintain a
 laboratory, including a mineral, rock, and core repository, for use by survey staff and to conduct other investigations in the line of physical and chemical testing and analysis and mineral identification as may be required in the execution of the plans and operations of the survey under this chapter.

(f) Issue from time to time reports and maps concerning
 geologic and mineral hazards in the state and the statistics and technology of the mineral industries of the state, including the results of investigations in mineral resources conservation practices; the use and recycling of scrap mineral products; the control, disposal, reclamation, and utilization of mining and mineral processing waste products; and the reclamation of mined lands.

(g) Conduct
 investigations in mining and metallurgy, including the use and recycling of scrap mineral products and land use practices as these apply to mineral resources conservation, and enter into, as the need arises, cooperative or contractual agreements for those investigations that may provide for cost sharing or cooperative funding.

(h) Conduct investigations in the study and development of methods for the control, disposal, reclamation,
 and utilization of mining and mineral processing waste products and the reclamation of mined lands, and enter into, as the need arises, cooperative or contractual agreements for those investigations that may provide for cost sharing or cooperative funding.

(i) Enter into, as the need arises, agreements, including, but not limited to, contracts, grant agreements, and cooperative agreements,
 that may provide funding or operational support for activities of the survey and for the activities of the department that are directly related to the activities of the survey. Activities that may be funded include, but are not limited to, technical, analytic, and research services related to geologic hazards and resources that the survey may provide directly to those entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 4.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.1.

Division 1 (commencing with Section 500) and this division shall not be construed as abridging the authorized geologic functions of other state agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

The State Geologist may prepare a special collection of ores and minerals of California to be sent to or used at any world’s fair or exposition in order to display the mineral wealth of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.1.

Notwithstanding Section 14670 of the Government Code, subject to the approval of the Director of General Services, the State Geologist may lease, for a period not to exceed 20 years, collections of ores and minerals of California for the public benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1042, Sec. 2.   Effective September 12, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2207.

(a) The owner or the operator of a mining operation within the state shall forward to the supervisor annually, not later than a date established by the supervisor, on forms approved by the board from time to time, a report that identifies all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the person, company, or other owner of the mining operation.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of a designated agent who resides in this state and who will receive and accept service of all orders, notices, and processes of the lead agency, board, supervisor, or court.

(3) The location of the mining operation, its name, its
 mine number as issued by the Division of Mine Reclamation, its section, township, range, latitude, longitude, and approximate boundaries of the mining operation marked on a United States Geological Survey 712-minute or 15-minute quadrangle map.

(4) The lead agency.

(5) The approval date of the mining operation’s reclamation plan.

(6) The mining operation’s status as active, idle, reclaimed, or in the process of being reclaimed.

(7) The commodities produced by the mine and the type of mining operation.

(8) A copy of the previously completed annual inspection form and a requested date, within
 12 months of the prior inspection date, for the next annual inspection by the lead agency.

(9) Proof of financial assurances.

(10) Ownership of the property, including government agencies, if applicable, by the assessor’s parcel number, and total assessed value of the mining operation.

(11) The approximate permitted size of the mining operation subject to the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710)), in acres.

(12) The approximate total acreage of land newly disturbed by the mining operation during the previous calendar year.

(13) The approximate total of disturbed acreage reclaimed during the previous calendar year.

(14) The approximate total unreclaimed disturbed acreage remaining as of the end of the calendar year.

(15) The total production for each mineral commodity produced during the previous year.

(16) A copy of any approved reclamation plan and any amendments or conditions of approval to any existing reclamation plan approved by the lead agency.

(b) (1) Every year, not later than the date established by the supervisor, the person submitting the report pursuant to subdivision (a) shall forward to the lead agency, on forms furnished by the board, a report that provides all of the information specified in subdivision (a).

(2) The owner or operator of a mining operation shall
 allow access to the property to any governmental agency or the agent of any company providing financial assurance mechanisms in connection with the reclamation plan in order that the reclamation can be carried out by the entity or company in accordance with the reclamation plan.

(c) Subsequent reports shall include only changes in the information submitted for the items described in subdivision (a), except that, instead of the approved reclamation plan, the reports shall include any reclamation plan amendments approved during the previous year. The reports shall state whether review of a reclamation plan, financial assurances, or an interim management plan is pending under subdivision (h) of Section 2770, or whether an appeal before the board or lead agency governing body is pending under subdivision (e) or (h) of Section 2770. The supervisor shall notify the person submitting the report and the owner’s designated agent in writing that the
 report and the fee required pursuant to subdivision (d) have been received, specify the mining operation’s mine number if one has not been issued by the Division of Mine Reclamation, and notify the person and agent of any deficiencies in the report within 90 days of receipt. That person or agent shall have 30 days from receipt of the notification to correct the noted deficiencies and forward the revised report to the supervisor and the lead agency. A person who fails to comply with this section, or knowingly provides incorrect or false information in reports required by this section, may be subject to an administrative penalty as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1.

(d) (1) The board shall impose, by regulation, pursuant to paragraph (2), an annual reporting fee on, and method for collecting annual fees from, each active or idle mining operation. The maximum fee for any single mining operation shall not exceed
 ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually and shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) annually, as adjusted for the cost of living as measured by the California Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, calendar year averages, using the percentage change in the previous year, except that the maximum fee for any single mining operation shall not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) in the 2017–18 fiscal year and eight thousand dollars ($8,000) in the 2018–19 fiscal year.

(2) (A) The board shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of fees authorized under paragraph (1) to cover the department’s cost in carrying out this section and the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710)), as reflected in the Governor’s proposed Budget, and may adopt those regulations as emergency regulations. In establishing the schedule of fees to be paid by each active and idle mining operation,
 the fees shall be calculated on an equitable basis reflecting the size and type of operation. The board shall also consider the total assessed value of the mining operation, the acreage disturbed by mining activities, and the acreage subject to the reclamation plan.

(B) Regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be adopted by the board in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of any emergency regulations pursuant to this subdivision shall be considered necessary to address an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

(3) The total revenue generated by the reporting fees shall not exceed, and may be less than,
 the amount of eight million dollars ($8,000,000), as adjusted for the cost of living as measured by the California Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, calendar year averages, using the percentage change in the previous year, beginning with the 2017–18 fiscal year and annually thereafter. If the director determines that the revenue collected during the preceding fiscal year was greater or less than the cost to operate the program, the board shall adjust the fees to compensate for the overcollection or undercollection of revenues.

(4) (A) The reporting fees established pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the Mine Reclamation Account, which is hereby created. Any fees, penalties, interest, fines, or charges collected by the supervisor or board pursuant to this chapter or the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710)) shall be deposited into the Mine
 Reclamation Account. The money in the account shall be available to the department and board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of carrying out this section and complying with the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710)), which includes, but is not limited to, the classification and designation of areas with mineral resources of statewide or regional significance, reclamation plan and financial assurance review, mine inspection, and enforcement.

(B) (i) In addition to reporting fees, the board shall collect five dollars ($5) per ounce of gold and ten cents ($0.10) per ounce of silver mined within the state and shall deposit the fees collected into the Abandoned Mine Reclamation and Minerals Fund Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Mine Reclamation Account. The department may expend the moneys in the subaccount, upon appropriation by the Legislature,
 for only the purposes of Section 2796.5 and as authorized herein for the remediation of abandoned mines.

(ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (j) of Section 2796.5, fees collected pursuant to clause (i) may also be used to remediate features of historic abandoned mines and lands that they impact. For purposes of this section, historic abandoned mines are mines for which operations have been conducted before January 1, 1976, and include, but are not limited to, historic gold and silver mines.
